Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
ARTICLE 10
UNIFORM DISSOLUTION OF MARRIAGE ACT

Editor's note:

(1) This article was numbered as article 1 of chapter 46, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1971, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1971, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

(2) For the legality of common-law marriages in this state, see Graham v. Graham, 130 Colo. 225, 274 P.2d 605 (1954).

Law reviews:

For article, "Divorce Mediation: A Financial Perspective", see 13

C

olo. Law. 1650 (1984); for article, "Tax

C

onsequences of Dissolution of Marriage Under the 1984 Tax Reform Act -- Parts I and II", see 13 Colo. Law. 2012 and 2222 (1984); for article, "Dramatic Divorce Taxation Changes", see 13 Colo. Law. 2038 (1984); for article, "The Civil Service Retirement Spouse Equity Act of 1984", see 14 Colo. Law. 1413 (1985); for article, "Joinder of Claims and Counterclaims in Cases Under the Uniform Dissolution of Marriage Act", see 15 Colo. Law. 1818 (1986); for article, "Cohabitation Agreements in Colorado", see 15 Colo. Law. 979 (1986); for article, "Common Law Marriage in Colorado", see 16 Colo. Law. 252 (1987); for article, "Child Support Obligations After Death of the Supporting Parent", see 16 Colo. Law. 790 (1987); for article, "Ownership of Personal Property Accumulated During a Marriage", see 17 Colo. Law. 623 (1988); for article, "Dissolution of Marriage and Estate Planning Issues", see 18 Colo. Law. 439 (1989); for article, "ADR: Explanations, Examples and Effective Use", see 18 Colo. Law. 843 (1989); for article, "Divorce and Family Mediation: Must it be Confidential?", see 18 Colo. Law. 925 (1989); for article, "Update on Ethics and Malpractice Avoidance in Family Law -- Parts I and II", see 19 Colo. Law. 465 and 647 (1990); for article, "Annulments in Colorado", see 22 Colo. Law. 2249 (1993); for article, "Property Division in Dissolution: Partnership Versus Needs Analysis", see 23 Colo. Law. 2115 (1994); for article, "Protecting a Disabled Client in a Dissolution of Marriage Action", see 24 Colo. Law. 795 (1995); for casenote, "Inappropriate Application of the Best Interests of the Child Standard Leads to Worst Case Scenario: In re C.C.R.S.", see 68 U. Colo. L. Rev. 259 (1997); for article, "Interstate Family Law Jurisdiction: Simplifying Complex Questions", see 31 Colo. Law. 77 (Sept. 2002); for article, "Marital Agreements in Colorado", see 36 Colo. Law. 53 (Feb. 2007); for article, "Colorado Civil Union Act", see 42 Colo. Law. 91 (July 2013); for article, "The Motion in Limine: Use in Domestic Relations Cases", see 43 Colo. Law. 47 (March 2014).

Section

14-10-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Uniform Dissolution of Marriage Act".

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 520, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-1.

14-10-102. Purposes - rules of construction.

This article 10 must be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes.

The underlying purposes of this article 10 are:

To promote the amicable settlement of disputes that have arisen between parties to a marriage;

To mitigate the potential harm to the spouses and their children caused by the process of legal dissolution of marriage;

To make the law of legal dissolution of marriage more effective for dealing with the realities of matrimonial experience by making an irretrievable breakdown of the marriage relationship the sole basis for its dissolution; and

To provide safeguards for a parent with a disability, pursuant to the provisions of section 24-34-805.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 520, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-2.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1104), ch. 164, p. 1133, § 2, effective April 25.

14-10-103. Definitions and interpretation of terms.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires, the term "decree" includes the term "judgment"; and, for the purposes of the tax laws of the state of Colorado or of any other jurisdiction, the term "maintenance" includes the term "alimony".

Whenever any law of this state refers to or mentions divorce, annulment, or separate maintenance, said law shall be interpreted as if the words dissolution of marriage, declaration of invalidity of marriage, and legal separation, respectively, were substituted therefor.

On and after July 1, 1993, the term "visitation" has been changed to "parenting time". It is not the intent of the general assembly to modify or change the meaning of the term "visitation" nor to alter the legal rights of a parent with respect to the child as a result of changing the term "visitation" to "parenting time".

On and after February 1, 1999, the term "custody" and related terms such as "custodial" and "custodian" have been changed to "parental responsibilities". It is not the intent of the general assembly to modify or change the meaning of the term "custody" nor to alter the legal rights of any custodial parent with respect to the child as a result of changing the term "custody" to "parental responsibilities".

As used in this article 10, unless the context otherwise requires, for purposes of proceedings for allocation of parental responsibilities pursuant to section 14-10-123 (1.5) only, the term "child" means an unmarried individual who has not attained twenty-one years of age.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 520, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-4.

L. 72:

p. 595, § 73.

L. 73:

p. 552, § 1.

L. 93:

(3) added, p. 576, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(3) amended and (4) added, p. 1376, § 1, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2019:

(5) added, (HB 19-1042), ch. 55, p. 193, § 4, effective March 28.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act enacting subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 165, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

14-10-104. Uniformity of application and construction.

This article shall be so applied and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this article among those states which enact it.

The term "irretrievable breakdown" shall be construed as being similar to other terms having a like import in the law of other jurisdictions adopting this or a similar law.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 520, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-3.

14-10-104.5. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly recognizes that it is in the best interests of the parties to a marriage in which a dissolution has been granted and in which there are children of the marriage for the parties to be able to resolve disputes that arise subsequent to the dissolution in an amicable and fair manner. The general assembly further recognizes that, in most cases, it is in the best interests of the children of the marriage to have a relationship with both parents, including a parent with a disability, and that, in most cases, it is the parents' right to have a relationship with their children. The general assembly emphasizes that one of the underlying purposes of this article 10 is to mitigate the potential harm to the spouses and their children and the relationships between the parents and their children caused by the process of legal dissolution of marriage. The general assembly recognizes that when a marriage in which children are involved is dissolved, both parties either agree to or are subject to orders that contain certain obligations and commitments. The general assembly declares that the honoring and enforcing of those obligations and commitments made by both parties are necessary to maintaining a relationship that is in the best interest of the children of the marriage. Therefore, the general assembly declares that both parties should honor and fulfill all of the obligations and commitments made between the parties and ordered by the court.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 633, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 1376, § 2, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1104), ch. 164, p. 1134, § 3, effective April 25.

14-10-105. Application of Colorado rules of civil procedure.

The Colorado rules of civil procedure apply to all proceedings under this article, except as otherwise specifically provided in this article.

A proceeding for dissolution of marriage, legal separation, or declaration of invalidity of marriage shall be entitled "In re the Marriage of ........ and ..........". A proceeding for the allocation of parental responsibilities or a support proceeding shall be entitled "In re the (Parental responsibilities concerning) (Support of) ..........".

(2.5) A proceeding for dissolution of a civil union, legal separation, or declaration of invalidity of a civil union shall be entitled "In re the Civil Union of ........ and ........".

The initial pleading in all proceedings under this article shall be denominated a petition. A responsive pleading shall be denominated a response. Other pleadings and all pleadings in other matters under this article shall be denominated as provided in the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 521, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-5.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 1395, § 33, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2013:

(2.5) added, (SB 13-011), ch. 49, p. 163, § 13, effective May 1.

14-10-106. Dissolution of marriage - legal separation.

The district court shall enter a decree of dissolution of marriage or a decree of legal separation when:

The court finds that one of the parties has been domiciled in this state for ninety-one days next preceding the commencement of the proceeding;

The court finds that the marriage is irretrievably broken; and

The court finds that ninety-one days or more have elapsed since it acquired jurisdiction over the respondent either as the result of process pursuant to rule 4 of the Colorado rules of civil procedure or as the result of the act of the respondent in joining as copetitioner in the petition or in entering an appearance in any other manner.

In connection with every decree of dissolution of marriage or decree of legal separation and to the extent of its jurisdiction to do so, the court shall consider, approve, or allocate parental responsibilities with respect to any child of the marriage, the support of any child of the marriage who is entitled to support, the maintenance of either spouse, and the disposition of property; but the entry of a decree with respect to parental responsibilities, support, maintenance, or disposition of property may be deferred by the court until after the entry of the decree of dissolution of marriage or the decree of legal separation upon a finding that a deferral is in the best interests of the parties.

In a proceeding to dissolve a marriage or in a proceeding for legal separation or in a proceeding for declaration of invalidity, the court is deemed to have made an adjudication of the parentage of a child of the marriage if the court acts under circumstances that satisfy the jurisdictional requirements of section 14-5-201 and the final order:

Expressly identifies a child as a "child of the marriage", "issue of the marriage", or similar words indicating that the husband is the father of the child; or

Provides for support of the child by the husband unless paternity is specifically disclaimed in the order.

Paternity is not adjudicated for a child not mentioned in the final order.

If a party requests a decree of legal separation rather than a decree of dissolution of marriage, the court shall grant the decree in that form unless the other party objects.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 521, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-6.

L. 73:

p. 552, § 2.

L. 77:

(1)(a)(I) and (1)(a)(II) amended and (1)(a)(III) added, p. 823, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 98:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1395, § 34, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2003:

(1)(c) and (1)(d) added, p. 1264, § 50, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

IP(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, (HB12-1233), ch. 52, p. 187, § 1, effective July 1; (1)(a)(I) and (1)(a)(III) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 830, § 24, effective July 1.

14-10-106.5. Dissolution of civil unions - legal separation - jurisdiction - applicability of article and case law.

Any person who enters into a civil union in Colorado pursuant to article 15 of this title consents to the jurisdiction of the courts of Colorado for the purpose of any action relating to a civil union even if one or both parties cease to reside in this state. In a matter seeking a dissolution, legal separation, or declaration of invalidity of a civil union, the court shall follow the procedures that are set forth in this article for dissolution, legal separation, or declaration of invalidity. The provisions of this article and any case law construing this article apply to the dissolution, legal separation, or declaration of invalidity of a civil union.

The court shall follow the laws of Colorado in a matter filed in Colorado that is seeking a dissolution, legal separation, or invalidity of a civil union that was entered into in another jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-011), ch. 49, p. 163, § 14, effective May 1.

14-10-107. Commencement - pleadings - abolition of existing defenses - automatic, temporary injunction - enforcement.

All proceedings under this article shall be commenced in the manner provided by the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

The petition in a proceeding for dissolution of marriage or legal separation shall allege that the marriage is irretrievably broken and shall set forth:

The residence of each party and the length of residence in this state;

The date and place of the marriage;

The date on which the parties separated;

The names, ages, and addresses of any living children of the marriage and whether the wife is pregnant;

Any arrangements as to the allocation of parental responsibilities with respect to the children of the marriage and support of the children and the maintenance of a spouse;

The relief sought; and

A written acknowledgment by the petitioner and the co-petitioner, if any, that he or she has received a copy of, has read, and understands the terms of the automatic temporary injunction required by paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of this section.

(2.5) Upon the filing of a petition for dissolution of marriage or legal separation pursuant to this article, each party shall provide to the court, in the manner prescribed by the court, his or her social security number and the social security number of each child named in the petition pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection (2) of this section.

Either or both parties to the marriage may initiate the proceeding. In addition, a legal guardian, with court approval pursuant to section 15-14-315.5, C.R.S., or a conservator, with court approval pursuant to section 15-14-425.5, C.R.S., may initiate the proceeding. If a legal guardian or conservator initiates the proceeding, the legal guardian or conservator shall receive notice in the same manner as the parties to the proceeding.

Upon the commencement of a proceeding by one of the parties, or by a legal guardian or conservator of one of the parties, the other party shall be personally served in the manner provided by the Colorado rules of civil procedure, and he or she may file a response in accordance with such rules; except that, upon motion verified by the oath of the party commencing the proceeding or of someone in his or her behalf for an order of publication stating the facts authorizing such service, and showing the efforts, if any, that have been made to obtain personal service within this state, and giving the address or last-known address of each person to be served or stating that his or her address and last-known address are unknown, the court shall hear the motion ex parte and, if satisfied that due diligence has been used to obtain personal service within this state or that efforts to obtain the same would have been to no avail, shall order one publication of a consolidated notice in a newspaper published or having general circulation in the county in which the proceeding is filed, notwithstanding the provisions of article 70 of title 24. A consolidated notice shall be published at least once during a calendar month and shall list the proceedings filed subsequent to those named in the previously published consolidated notice, stating as to each proceeding the names of the parties, the action number, the nature of the action, that a copy of the petition and summons may be obtained from the clerk of the court during regular business hours, and that default judgment may be entered against that party upon whom service is made by such notice if he or she fails to appear or file a response within thirty-five days after the date of publication. Costs of publication of a consolidated notice may be assessed pro rata to each of the proceedings named in the notice; except that, if a party is indigent or otherwise unable to pay such publication costs, the costs shall be paid by the court from funds appropriated for the purpose. Service shall be complete upon such publication, and a response or appearance by the party served by publication under this subsection (4) shall be made within thirty-five days thereafter, or default judgment may be entered. No later than the day of publication, the clerk of the court shall also post for thirty-five consecutive days a copy of the process on a bulletin board in his or her office or on the website of the district court in which the case was filed and shall mail a copy of the process to the other party at his or her last-known address, and shall place in the file of the proceeding his or her certificate of posting and mailing. Proof of publication of the consolidated notice shall be by placing in the file a copy of the affidavit of publication, certified by the clerk of the court to be a true and correct copy of the original affidavit on file in the clerk's office.

Upon the filing of a petition for dissolution of marriage or legal separation by the petitioner or copetitioner or by a legal guardian or conservator on behalf of one of the parties and upon personal service of the petition and summons on the respondent or upon waiver and acceptance of service by the respondent, a temporary injunction shall be in effect against both parties until the final decree is entered or the petition is dismissed or until further order of the court:

Restraining both parties from transferring, encumbering, concealing, or in any way disposing of, without the consent of the other party or an order of the court, any marital property, except in the usual course of business or for the necessities of life and requiring each party to notify the other party of any proposed extraordinary expenditures and to account to the court for all extraordinary expenditures made after the injunction is in effect;

Enjoining both parties from molesting or disturbing the peace of the other party;

Restraining both parties from removing the minor child or children of the parties, if any, from the state without the consent of the other party or an order of the court; and

Restraining both parties, without at least fourteen days' advance notification and the written consent of the other party or an order of the court, from canceling, modifying, terminating, or allowing to lapse for nonpayment of premiums, any policy of health insurance, homeowner's or renter's insurance, or automobile insurance that provides coverage to either of the parties or the minor children or any policy of life insurance that names either of the parties or the minor children as a beneficiary.

The provisions of the injunction shall be printed upon the summons and the petition and the injunction shall become an order of the court upon fulfillment of the requirements of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b). However, nothing in this paragraph (b) shall preclude either party from applying to the court for further temporary orders, an expanded temporary injunction, or modification or revocation under section 14-10-108.

The summons shall contain the following advisements:

That a request for genetic tests shall not prejudice the requesting party in matters concerning allocation of parental responsibilities pursuant to section 14-10-124 (1.5); and

That, if genetic tests are not obtained prior to a legal establishment of paternity and submitted into evidence prior to the entry of the legal final decree of dissolution, the genetic tests may not be allowed into evidence at a later date.

(4.1) With regard to the automatic, temporary injunction that becomes effective in accordance with paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of this section when a petition for dissolution of marriage or legal separation is filed and served, whenever there is exhibited by the respondent to any duly authorized peace officer as described in section 16-2.5-101, C.R.S., a copy of the petition and summons duly filed and issued pursuant to this section, or, in the case of the petitioner, a copy of the petition and summons duly filed and issued pursuant to this section, together with a certified copy of the affidavit of service of process or a certified copy of the waiver and acceptance of service, and the peace officer has cause to believe that a violation of that part of the automatic, temporary injunction which enjoins both parties from molesting the other party has occurred, such peace officer shall use every reasonable means to enforce that part of the injunction against the petitioner or respondent. A peace officer shall not be held civilly or criminally liable for his or her action pursuant to this subsection (4.1) if the action is in good faith and without malice.

Defenses to divorce and legal separation existing prior to January 1, 1972, including but not limited to condonation, connivance, collusion, recrimination, insanity, and lapse of time, are hereby abolished.

All issues raised by these proceedings shall be resolved by the court sitting without a jury.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 521, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-7.

L. 72:

p. 296, § 1.

L. 83:

(4) amended, p. 641, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(4.1) added, p. 716, § 1, effective April 29.

L. 87:

(4.1) amended, p. 1578, § 21, effective July 10.

L. 98:

(2)(e) amended, p. 1395, § 35, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 99:

(2)(g) and (4)(b)(I)(D) added and (4)(b)(I)(B), (4)(b)(I)(C), and (4)(b)(II) amended, p. 1059, §§ 1, 2, effective June 1; (3), (4)(a), and IP(4)(b)(I) amended, p. 465, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(3) amended, p. 1833, § 7, effective January 1, 2001.

L. 2003:

(4.1) amended, p. 1621, § 34, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

(4)(b)(III) added, p. 377, § 1, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2011:

(2.5) added, (SB 11-123), ch. 46, p. 118, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(4)(a) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 830, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(4)(a) amended, (HB 16-1258), ch. 116, p. 329, § 1, effective April 21.

L. 2017:

(4)(a) amended, (HB 17-1142), ch. 66, p. 209, § 5, effective September 1.

14-10-107.5. Entry of appearance and notice of withdrawal by delegate child support enforcement unit.

The attorney for the delegate child support enforcement unit may file an entry of appearance on behalf of the county department of human or social services in any proceeding for dissolution of marriage or legal separation under this article 10 for purposes of establishing, modifying, and enforcing child support and medical support if any party is receiving child support services pursuant to section 26-13-106 and for purposes of establishing and enforcing reimbursement of payments for temporary assistance to needy families.

The delegate child support enforcement unit, upon the filing of the entry of appearance described in subsection (1) of this section or upon the filing of a legal pleading to establish, modify, or enforce the support obligation, is from that date forward, without leave or order of court, a third-party intervenor in the action for the purposes outlined in subsection (1) of this section without the necessity of filing a motion to intervene.

The delegate child support enforcement unit may withdraw as a party from a case when the case is closed without leave of the court by filing a notice pursuant to the Colorado rules of civil procedure. Upon the filing of such notice, the delegate child support enforcement unit is no longer considered a party to the action without the necessity of filing a motion to dismiss party.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 792, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 889, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 1648, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 400, § 12, effective August 8; entire section amended, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2321, § 1, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section was amended in SB 18-092. Those amendments were superseded by the amendment of this section in HB 18-1363, effective August 8, 2018.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

14-10-107.7. Required notice of involvement with state department of human services.

When filing a petition for dissolution of marriage or legal separation, a petition in support or proceedings for the allocation of parental responsibilities with respect to the children of the marriage, or any other matter pursuant to this article 10 with the court, if the parties have joint legal responsibility for a child for whom the petition seeks an order of child support, the parties are required to indicate on a form prepared by the court whether or not the parties or the dependent children of the parties have received within the last five years or are currently receiving benefits or public assistance, including child care assistance, from the state department of human services or a county department of human or social services. If the parties indicate that they have received such benefits or assistance, the court shall inform the appropriate delegate child support enforcement unit so that the unit can determine whether any support enforcement services are required. There is no penalty for failure to report as specified in this section.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 202, § 8, effective August 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1558, § 6, effective September 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2644, § 106, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 1396, § 36, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 400, § 13, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 828, § 30, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

14-10-107.8. Required notice of prior restraining, civil protection, or emergency protection orders to prevent domestic abuse - petitions for dissolution of marriage or legal separation.

When filing a petition for dissolution of marriage or legal separation pursuant to this article, the filing party shall have a duty to disclose to the court the existence of any prior temporary or permanent restraining orders and civil protection orders to prevent domestic abuse issued pursuant to article 14 of title 13, C.R.S., any mandatory restraining order and protection orders issued pursuant to section 18-1-1001, C.R.S., and any emergency protection orders issued pursuant to section 13-14-103, C.R.S., entered against either party by any court within two years prior to the filing of the petition of dissolution of marriage or legal separation. The disclosure required pursuant to this section shall address the subject matter of the previous restraining, civil protection, or emergency protection orders, including the case number and jurisdiction issuing such orders.

After the filing of the petition, the court shall advise the parties concerning domestic violence services and potential financial resources that may be available and shall strongly encourage the parties to obtain such services for their children, in appropriate cases. If the parties' children participate in such services, the court shall apportion the costs of such services between the parties as it deems appropriate.

The parties to a domestic relations petition filed pursuant to this article shall receive information concerning domestic violence services and potential financial resources that may be available.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 83, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 502, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 978, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 554, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 764, § 22, effective June 1.

14-10-108. Temporary orders in a dissolution case.

In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage, legal separation, the allocation of parental responsibilities, or declaration of invalidity of marriage or a proceeding for disposition of property, maintenance, or support following dissolution of the marriage, either party may move for temporary payment of debts, use of property, maintenance, parental responsibilities, support of a child of the marriage entitled to support, or payment of attorney fees. The motion may be supported by an affidavit setting forth the factual basis for the motion and the amounts requested.

(1.5) The court may consider the allocation of parental responsibilities in accordance with the best interests of the child, with particular reference to the factors specified in section 14-10-124 (1.5).

As a part of a motion of such temporary orders or by an independent motion accompanied by an affidavit, either party may request the court to issue a temporary order:

Restraining any party from transferring, encumbering, concealing, or in any way disposing of any property, except in the usual course of business or for the necessities of life, and, if so restrained, requiring him to notify the moving party of any proposed extraordinary expenditures and to account to the court for all extraordinary expenditures made after the order is issued;

Enjoining a party from molesting or disturbing the peace of the other party or of any child;

Excluding a party from the family home or from the home of the other party upon a showing that physical or emotional harm would otherwise result.

(2.3) and (2.5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 553, § 4, effective July 1, 2004.)

A party to an action filed pursuant to this article may seek, and the court may issue, a temporary or permanent protection order pursuant to the provisions of part 1 of article 14 of title 13, C.R.S.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 553, § 4, effective July 1, 2004.)

A temporary order or temporary injunction:

Does not prejudice the rights of the parties or the child which are to be adjudicated at subsequent hearings in the proceeding;

May be revoked or modified prior to final decree on a showing by affidavit of the facts necessary to revocation or modification of a final decree under section 14-10-122; and

Terminates when the final decree is entered, unless continued by the court for good cause to a date certain, or when the petition for dissolution or legal separation is voluntarily dismissed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 553, § 4, effective July 1, 2004.)

At the time a protection order is requested pursuant to part 1 of article 14 of title 13, C.R.S., the court shall inquire about, and the requesting party and such party's attorney shall have an independent duty to disclose, knowledge such party and such party's attorney may have concerning the existence of any prior protection orders or restraining orders of any court addressing in whole or in part the subject matter of the requested protection order.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 522, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-8.

L. 73:

pp. 553, 555, §§ 3, 12.

L. 81:

(6) added, p. 903, § 1, effective May 13.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 644, § 1, effective April 26; (1.5) added, p. 645, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 87:

(1.5) amended, p. 575, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(2.5) and (7) added and (3) amended, p. 2008, § 4, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 98:

(2.3) added and (3) amended, p. 245, § 4, effective April 13; (1) and (2.5) amended, p. 1396, § 37, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 99:

(2.3) amended, p. 501, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1.5) amended, p. 1844, § 24, effective August 2.

L. 2003:

(2.3), (2.5), (3), (6), and (7) amended, p. 1010, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

IP(2), (2.3), (2.5), (3), (4), (6), and (7) amended, p. 553, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(3) and (7) amended, (HB 13-1259), ch. 218, p. 1016, § 17, effective July 1.

14-10-109. Enforcement of protection orders.

The duties of peace officers enforcing orders issued pursuant to section 14-10-107 or 14-10-108 shall be in accordance with section 18-6-803.5, C.R.S., and any rules adopted by the Colorado supreme court pursuant to said section.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 523, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-9.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 176, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2009, § 5, effective January 1, 1995.

Cross references:

For civil contempt, see C.R.C.P. 107.

14-10-110. Irretrievable breakdown.

If both of the parties by petition or otherwise have stated under oath or affirmation that the marriage is irretrievably broken or one of the parties has so stated and the other has not denied it, there is a presumption of such fact, and, unless controverted by evidence, the court shall, after hearing, make a finding that the marriage is irretrievably broken.

If one of the parties has denied under oath or affirmation that the marriage is irretrievably broken, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including the circumstances that gave rise to the filing of the petition and the prospect of reconciliation, and shall:

Make a finding whether the marriage is irretrievably broken; or

Continue the matter for further hearing not less than thirty-five days nor more than sixty-three days later, or as soon thereafter as the matter may be reached on the court's calendar, and may suggest to the parties that they seek counseling. At the adjourned hearing, the court shall make a finding whether the marriage is irretrievably broken.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 523, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-10.

L. 2012:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 831, § 26, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For marriage counseling, see article 12 of this title 14.

14-10-111. Declaration of invalidity.

The district court shall enter its decree declaring the invalidity of a marriage entered into under the following circumstances:

A party lacked capacity to consent to the marriage at the time the marriage was solemnized, either because of mental incapacity or infirmity or because of the influence of alcohol, drugs, or other incapacitating substances.

A party lacked the physical capacity to consummate the marriage by sexual intercourse, and the other party did not at the time the marriage was solemnized know of the incapacity.

A party was under the age as provided by law and did not have the consent of his parents or guardian or judicial approval as provided by law.

One party entered into the marriage in reliance upon a fraudulent act or representation of the other party, which fraudulent act or representation goes to the essence of the marriage.

One or both parties entered into the marriage under duress exercised by the other party or a third party, whether or not such other party knew of such exercise of duress.

One or both parties entered into the marriage as a jest or dare.

The marriage is prohibited by law, including the following:

A marriage entered into prior to the dissolution of an earlier marriage of one of the parties;

A marriage between an ancestor and a descendant or between a brother and a sister, whether the relationship is by the half or the whole blood;

A marriage between an uncle and a niece or between an aunt and a nephew, whether the relationship is by the half or the whole blood, except as to marriages permitted by the established customs of aboriginal cultures;

A marriage which was void by the law of the place where such marriage was contracted.

A declaration of invalidity under subsection (1) of this section may be sought by any of the following persons and shall be commenced within the times specified, but in no event may a declaration of invalidity be sought after the death of either party to the marriage, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section:

For the reasons set forth in either subsection (1)(a), (1)(d), (1)(e), or (1)(f) of this section, by either party to the marriage who was aggrieved by the conditions or by the legal representative of the party who lacked capacity to consent no later than six months after the petitioner obtained knowledge of the described condition;

For the reason set forth in subsection (1)(b) of this section, by either party no later than one year after the petitioner obtained knowledge of the described condition;

For the reason set forth in subsection (1)(c) of this section, by the underage party, his parent, or his guardian, if such action for declaration of invalidity of marriage is commenced within twenty-four months of the date the marriage was entered into.

A declaration of invalidity, for the reason set forth in subsection (1)(g) of this section, may be sought by either party; by the legal spouse in case of bigamous, polygamous, or incestuous marriages; by the appropriate state official; or by a child of either party at any time prior to the death of either party or prior to the final settlement of the estate of either party and the discharge of the personal representative, executor, or administrator of the estate or prior to six months after an estate is closed under section 15-12-1204, C.R.S.

Repealed.

Marriages declared invalid under this section shall be so declared as of the date of the marriage.

The provisions of this article relating to the property rights of spouses, maintenance, and support of and the allocation of parental responsibilities with respect to the children on dissolution of marriage are applicable to decrees of invalidity of marriage.

No decree shall be entered unless one of the parties has been domiciled in this state for thirty days next preceding the commencement of the proceeding or unless the marriage has been contracted in this state.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 523, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-11.

L. 73:

pp. 553, 1647, §§ 4, 5, 6.

L. 80:

(1)(g)(II) amended, p. 794, § 47, effective June 5.

L. 98:

(6) amended, p. 1397, § 38, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2018:

(4) repealed, (SB 18-095), ch. 96, p. 754, § 8, effective August 8.

Cross references:

(1) For the effect of a declaration of invalidity on marital agreements, see § 14-2-308.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 18-095, see section 1 of chapter 96, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.